apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_noms.en.dix
  <pardef n="pen/ny__n">
    <e c="CP: nouns which remove -ny and add -ce or -nies (LR)">
     <p>
       <l>ny</l>
       <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>ce</l>
       <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>nies</l>
       <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="phalan/x__n">
    <e c="CP: nouns which remove -x and add -ges or -xes (LR)">
     <p>
       <l>x</l>
       <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>ges</l>
       <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>xes</l>
       <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="corp/us__n">
    <e c="CP: nouns which remove -us and add -ora or -uses (LR)">
     <p>
       <l>us</l>
       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>ora</l>
       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>uses</l>
       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
  

  
  <pardef n="archipelago__n">
    <e c="CP: nouns which  add -s or -es (LR)">
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>s</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>es</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="cact/us__n">
    <e c="CP: nouns which remove -us and add -i or -es (LR)">
     <p>
       <l>us</l>
       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>i</l>
       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>uses</l>
       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
    <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>us</l>
       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
 <pardef n="zebra__n">
   <e c="CP: singular spelling">
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e c="CP: plural spelling: add -s">
     <p>
       <l>s</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR" c="CP: alternative plural spelling (not very common): invariable singular form">
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

<pardef n="BBC__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


  </pardefs>

<e lm="TV"><i>TV</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="campus"><i>camp</i><par n="corp/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="focus"><i>foc</i><par n="cact/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="tobacco"><i>tobacco</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="consensus"><i>consens</i><par n="corp/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="euro"><i>euro</i><par n="zebra__n"/></e>
<e lm="seed"><i>seed</i><par n="zebra__n"/></e>
<e lm="stucco"><i>stucco</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="penny"><i>pen</i><par n="pen/ny__n"/></e>
<e lm="avocado"><i>avocado</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="fiasco"><i>fiasco</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="squid"><i>squid</i><par n="zebra__n"/></e>
<e lm="jumbo"><i>jumbo</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="fresco"><i>fresco</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="placebo"><i>placebo</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="calico"><i>calico</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="zebra"><i>zebra</i><par n="zebra__n"/></e>
<e lm="phosphorus"><i>phosphor</i><par n="corp/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="humus"><i>hum</i><par n="corp/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="plexus"><i>plex</i><par n="corp/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="portico"><i>portico</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="hippocampus"><i>hippocamp</i><par n="corp/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="retrovirus"><i>retrovir</i><par n="corp/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="cytomegalovirus"><i>cytomegalovir</i><par n="corp/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="humerus"><i>humer</i><par n="corp/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="caryatid"><i>caryatid</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="sirocco"><i>sirocco</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="iamb"><i>iamb</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="tao"><i>tao</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="morisco"><i>morisco</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="guanaco"><i>guanaco</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="cryptoportico"><i>cryptoportico</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
<e lm="enterovirus"><i>enterovir</i><par n="corp/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="nevus"><i>nev</i><par n="corp/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="meatus"><i>meat</i><par n="corp/us__n"/></e>
